Maryland, session 2026, HB0087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT” MEANS:
(I) A HOME ENERGY AUDIT;
(II) A QUALIFIED ENERGY EFFICIENCY IMPROVEMENT; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0087*

HOUSE BILL 87
(III) A RESIDENTIAL ENERGY PROPERTY EXPENDITURE.
(3) “HOME ENERGY AUDIT”, “QUALIFIED ENERGY EFFICIENCY
IMPROVEMENT”, AND “RESIDENTIAL ENERGY PROPERTY EXPENDITURE” HAVE THE
MEANINGS STATED IN § 25C OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL
MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR UP TO 30% OF THE
COSTS PAID OR INCURRED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, NOT TO EXCEED $3,200 IN THE
AGGREGATE, FOR ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENTS MADE TO THE
INDIVIDUAL’S RESIDENCE IN THE TAXABLE YEAR.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED:
1. $150 FOR A HOME ENERGY AUDIT;
2. $600 FOR A RESIDENTIAL ENERGY PROPERTY
EXPENDITURE OTHER THAN AN EXPENDITURE DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)
OF THIS SUBSECTION;
3. $600 TOTAL FOR EXTERIOR WINDOWS AND EXTERIOR
SKYLIGHTS; OR
4. $500 TOTAL FOR ALL EXTERIOR DOORS AT A RATE OF
UP TO $250 PER DOOR.
(II) THE AGGREGATE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED
UNDER THIS SECTION FOR ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENTS DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED $1,200 FOR A
TAXABLE YEAR.
(3) A CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR A RESIDENTIAL
ENERGY PROPERTY EXPENDITURE MAY NOT EXCEED $2,000 FOR A TAXABLE YEAR
FOR THE PURCHASE OR INSTALLATION OF:
(I) A HEAT PUMP;
(II) A HEAT PUMP WATER HEATER; OR
(III) A BIOMASS STOVE OR BIOMASS BOILER.

HOUSE BILL 87 3
(C) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY CLAIM A CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IF
THE ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT:
(I) WAS MADE TO THE RESIDENCE OF THE TAXPAYER; AND
(II) WAS ORIGINALLY PLACED IN SERVICE BY THE TAXPAYER.
(2) (I) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY CLAIM AN EXPENDITURE ON AN
ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT THAT WAS MADE TO MULTIPLE DWELLING
UNITS.
(II) THE AMOUNT OF CREDIT ALLOWABLE UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR AN ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT THAT WAS MADE TO MULTIPLE
DWELLING UNITS SHALL BE COMPUTED SEPARATELY WITH RESPECT TO THE
AMOUNT OF THE EXPENDITURE FOR EACH DWELLING UNIT.
(3) IN THE CASE OF A DWELLING UNIT TO WHICH ENERGY EFFICIENT
HOME IMPROVEMENTS ARE MADE THAT IS JOINTLY OCCUPIED AND USED DURING
ANY CALENDAR YEAR AS A RESIDENCE BY TWO OR MORE INDIVIDUALS, THE
EXPENDITURES ALLOCATED TO AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR SHALL BE
AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE LESSER OF:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF EXPENDITURES MADE BY THE INDIVIDUAL
TO THE DWELLING UNIT DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR; OR
(II) THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF EXPENDITURES MADE TO THE
DWELLING UNIT DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR MULTIPLIED BY A FRACTION:
1. THE NUMERATOR OF WHICH IS THE AMOUNT OF
EXPENDITURES WITH RESPECT TO THE DWELLING UNIT MADE BY THE INDIVIDUAL
DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR; AND
2. THE DENOMINATOR OF WHICH IS THE TOTAL
EXPENDITURES MADE BY ALL INDIVIDUALS WITH RESPECT TO THE DWELLING UNIT
DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR.
(4) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A TENANT–STOCKHOLDER OF A
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION SHALL BE TREATED AS HAVING MADE THE
INDIVIDUAL’S PROPORTIONATE SHARE OF ANY EXPENDITURES FOR AN ENERGY
EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT BY THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(5) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A MEMBER OF A CONDOMINIUM
MANAGEMENT ASSOCIATION, AS DEFINED UNDER § 25D(E)(6)(B) OF THE INTERNAL

HOUSE BILL 87
REVENUE CODE, SHALL BE TREATED AS HAVING MADE THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PROPORTIONATE SHARE OF ANY EXPENDITURES FOR AN ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME
IMPROVEMENT BY THE CONDOMINIUM MANAGEMENT ASSOCIATION WITH RESPECT
TO THE CONDOMINIUM THAT THE INDIVIDUAL OWNS.
(6) IF LESS THAN 80% OF THE USE OF AN ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME
IMPROVEMENT IS FOR NONBUSINESS PURPOSES, ONLY THE PORTION OF THE
EXPENDITURE FOR THE IMPROVEMENT ALLOCABLE FOR NONBUSINESS PURPOSES
MAY BE CONSIDERED.
(7) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AN EXPENDITURE FOR AN ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT
SHALL BE TREATED AS BEING MADE WHEN THE ORIGINAL INSTALLATION OF THE
IMPROVEMENT IS COMPLETED.
(II) FOR AN ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT MADE IN
CONNECTION WITH CONSTRUCTION OR RECONSTRUCTION OF A RESIDENCE, THE
EXPENDITURE SHALL BE TREATED AS BEING MADE WHEN THE ORIGINAL USE OF THE
RESIDENCE BY THE TAXPAYER BEGINS.
(D) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “SUBSIDIZED ENERGY FINANCING” MEANS
FINANCING PROVIDED UNDER A FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL PROGRAM, A
PRINCIPAL PURPOSE OF WHICH IS TO PROVIDE SUBSIDIZED FINANCING FOR
PROJECTS DESIGNED TO CONSERVE OR PRODUCE ENERGY.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT RECEIVE A CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR AN ENERGY EFFICIENT HOME IMPROVEMENT THAT WAS PURCHASED
WITH SUBSIDIZED ENERGY FINANCING.
(E) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL PROVIDE ANY DOCUMENTS OR INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THE COMPTROLLER TO RECEIVE A CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.